Massachusetts, session 194th, S619.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 94 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 64 the
following section:-
Section 65. (a) Subject to appropriation, the department of conservation and recreation
shall create signage informing the public how to properly act when coming in contact with
stranded aquatic wildlife and semiaquatic wildlife, such as seals, which the public may find lying
on a beach.
(b) Signage shall be placed on beaches near entry points or as the department of
conservation deems necessary to protect the health of public and any wildlife.
(c) The signage shall include the following information: (i) general information about the
aquatic and semiaquatic wildlife the public may find in the immediate area along the beach as
well as which species of wildlife may be in need of assistance if found; (ii) an appropriate phone
of 2

number to call if any wildlife is in need of assistance; (iii) a note of caution to the public not to
directly engage with the wildlife on the beach for their own safety and the safety of the wildlife;
and (iv) any other information that may be helpful to the public.
of 2